Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 10 Nuclear Pharmacy Law

26-4-170.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Nuclear Pharmacy Law.”

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-170

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 277, § 10.

26-4-171.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Authentication of product history” means, but is not limited to, identifying the purchasing source, the ultimate fate, and any intermediate handling of any component of a radiopharmaceutical.

“Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy.

“Compounding of radiopharmaceuticals” means the addition of a radioactive substance to nonradioactive substances or the use of a radioactive substance in preparation for single or multidose dispensation upon the prescription order of a physician who is licensed to use radioactive materials. Compounding of radiopharmaceuticals may include: loading and eluting of radionuclide generators; using manufactured reagent kits to prepare radiopharmaceuticals; preparing reagent kits; aliquoting reagents; formulation and quality assurance testing of radiochemicals for use as radiopharmaceuticals; and radiolabeling of compounds or products, including biological products, for use as radiopharmaceuticals.

“Department” means the Department of Natural Resources.

“Internal test assessment” means, but is not limited to, conducting those tests of quality assurance necessary to ensure the integrity of the test.

“Manufacturing of radiopharmaceuticals” means the preparation, derivation, or production of a product to which a radioactive substance is or will be added to provide a radiopharmaceutical for sale, resale, redistribution, or reconstitution.

“Nuclear pharmacy” means a pharmacy providing radiopharmaceutical service.

“Radiopharmaceutical” means radioactive drugs and chemical products used for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes and includes the terms radioactive pharmaceuticals, radioisotopes, and radioactive tracers.

“Radiopharmaceutical quality assurance” means, but is not limited to, the performance of appropriate chemical, biological, and physical tests on radiopharmaceuticals and their component materials and the interpretation of the resulting data to determine their suitability for use in humans and animals, including internal test assessment, authentication of product history, and the keeping of proper records.

“Radiopharmaceutical service” means, but is not limited to, the compounding, dispensing, labeling, and delivering of radiopharmaceuticals; the participation in radiopharmaceutical selection and radiopharmaceutical utilization review; the maintenance of radiopharmaceutical quality assurance; and the responsibility for advising, where necessary or where regulated, of therapeutic values, hazards, and use of radiopharmaceuticals; and the offering or performing of those acts, services, operations, or transactions necessary in the conduct, operation, management, and control of a nuclear pharmacy.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-171

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 277, § 10.

26-4-172.
License requirements generally.

All persons, firms, pharmacies, or corporations which receive, possess, transfer, or manufacture for sale or resale radiopharmaceuticals shall be licensed in accordance with the provisions of this article. No person may receive, acquire, possess, compound, or dispense any radiopharmaceutical except in accordance with the provisions of this article and the conditions of rules and regulations promulgated by the Board of Natural Resources for radioactive materials and administered by the department. The requirements of this article are in addition to, and not in substitution of, other applicable statutes and regulations administered by the State Board of Pharmacy or the department.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as requiring a licensed physician to obtain a separate license as a nuclear pharmacist, when his or her use of radiopharmaceuticals is limited to the diagnosis and treatment of his or her own patients.

Nothing in this article shall be construed so as to require a clinical laboratory certified by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, which is licensed by the Department of Community Health to handle radioactive materials, to obtain the services of a nuclear pharmacist, or to have a nuclear pharmacy license, unless the laboratory is engaged in the commercial sale or resale of radiopharmaceuticals.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to require a department of nuclear medicine which is located in a hospital of 250 beds or less, which has a board certified radiologist in the practice of nuclear medicine, and which is licensed by the department to handle radioactive materials to obtain the services of a nuclear pharmacist or to have a nuclear pharmacy license.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-172

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 277, § 10; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2021, p. 472, § 2/HB 93.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “require a clinical laboratory certified by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services” for “require a licensed clinical laboratory” near the beginning of subsection (c).

26-4-173.
Applicant requirements.

An applicant for a license as a nuclear pharmacist shall:

Be a currently licensed pharmacist in the State of Georgia;

Meet the minimum requirements and be licensed to possess and use radioactive materials for medical use, as authorized by the department; and

Have met all requirements for training and experience established by the board in rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this authority; provided, however, rules and regulations prescribing training and experience requirements for nuclear pharmacists shall have first been approved by the department.

A license as a nuclear pharmacist shall be issued to any pharmacist who makes application to the board, together with a required fee, and meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-173

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 277, § 10.

26-4-174.
Nuclear pharmacy operators permit; separate entity; quality; maintain records; compliance of laws; authorized dispensing; transfer; labeling; redistribution.

A permit to operate a nuclear pharmacy shall only be issued in accordance with Article 6 of this chapter with the added designation that the pharmacist in charge be a nuclear pharmacist. All personnel performing tasks in the preparation and distribution of radiopharmaceuticals shall be under the supervision of a licensed nuclear pharmacist. All acts of compounding and dispensing radiopharmaceuticals shall be performed by the nuclear pharmacist or by a pharmacist or pharmacy intern under the direct supervision and control of a nuclear pharmacist. A nuclear pharmacist shall be responsible for all operations of the nuclear pharmacy and shall be in personal attendance at all times when the acts of compounding and dispensing are performed and the pharmacy is open for business.

Nuclear pharmacies shall have adequate space, commensurate with the scope of services provided and, as required by rules and regulations promulgated by the board pursuant to implementation of this article, shall meet minimal space requirements established for all pharmacies in the state. The nuclear pharmacy area shall be separate from the pharmacy areas for nonradiopharmaceuticals and shall be secured from unauthorized personnel.

Nuclear pharmacies shall only dispense radiopharmaceuticals which comply with acceptable professional standards of radiopharmaceutical quality assurance.

Nuclear pharmacies shall maintain records of acquisition and disposition of all radiopharmaceuticals in accordance with requirements of the board and the department.

Nuclear pharmacies shall comply with all applicable laws and regulations of federal and state agencies, including those laws and regulations governing nonradioactive drugs and pharmaceuticals.

Radiopharmaceuticals are to be dispensed only upon prescription order by a physician who is authorized by the department to possess, use, and administer radioactive materials.

A nuclear pharmacist may transfer to authorized persons radioactive materials not intended for drug use, in accordance with department regulations for radioactive materials. A nuclear pharmacy may also furnish radioactive materials for use to physicians, for individual patient use in accordance with subsection (f) of this Code section.

In addition to any labeling requirements required by rules and regulations of the board for nonradiopharmaceuticals, the immediate outer container of a radiopharmaceutical to be dispensed shall also be labeled as required in rules and regulations of the board and of the department.

The amount of radioactivity dispensed in each individual preparation shall be determined by the nuclear pharmacist through radiometric methods immediately prior to dispensing.

Nuclear pharmacies may redistribute federal Food and Drug Administration approved radiopharmaceuticals if the pharmacy does not process the radiopharmaceuticals in any manner or violate the product packaging. Such redistribution may only be made to another nuclear pharmacy or other authorized person or institution.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-174

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 277, § 10.

26-4-175.
Meeting requirements of the board.

Nuclear pharmacies shall meet all requirements for items and articles of equipment as required through rules and regulations of the board. Nuclear pharmacies shall also have equipment required for the safe handling and storage of radioactive materials, as established by rules of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-175

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 277, § 10.

26-4-176.
Limiting, suspending, or revoking license.

The board may limit, suspend, or revoke licenses issued under the provisions of this article, or impose any other reasonable sanctions upon holders of such licenses upon proof of any of the violations specified in Code Sections 26-4-60 and 26-4-113.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-176

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 277, § 10.

26-4-177.
Board refusing to grant license.

The board may refuse to grant a license to any person, firm, or corporation for any of the grounds set forth in Code Sections 26-4-60 and 26-4-113. In addition, the board may refuse to grant a license if any applicant shall make any false statement in the application or cheats in any manner upon any examination administered pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-177

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 277, § 10.

26-4-178.
Authorized to promulgate rules.

The board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-178

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 277, § 10.

26-4-179.
Authority of department.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to repeal the authority of the Department of Natural Resources to regulate the use of radioactive materials.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-179

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 277, § 10.